District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Domestic violence” means an intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(5) [now (8)].

(2)

“Employee” means any individual employed by an employer, but shall not include:

(A)

Any individual who, without payment and without expectation of any gain, directly or indirectly, volunteers to engage in the activities of an educational, charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization;

(B)

Any lay member elected or appointed to office within the discipline of any religious organization and engaged in religious functions;

(C)

Any individual employed as a casual babysitter, in or about the residence of the employer.

(D)

An independent contractor;

(E)

A student; or

(F)

Health care workers who choose to participate in a premium pay program.

(3)

(A)

“Employer” means a legal entity (including a for-profit or nonprofit firm, partnership, proprietorship, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, association, or corporation), or any receiver or trustee of an entity (including the legal representative of a deceased individual or receiver or trustee of an individual), who directly or indirectly or through an agent or any other person, including through the services of a temporary services or staffing agency or similar entity, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of an employee.

(B)

The term “employer” shall include the District government.

(4)

“Family member” means:

(A)

(i)

A spouse, including the person identified by an employee as his or her domestic partner, as defined in § 32-701(3);

(ii)

The parents of a spouse;

(iii)

Children (including foster children and grandchildren);

(iv)

The spouses of children;

(v)

Parents;

(vi)

Brothers and sisters; and

(vii)

The spouses of brothers and sisters.

(B)

A child who lives with an employee and for whom the employee permanently assumes and discharges parental responsibility; or

(C)

A person with whom the employee shares or has shared, for not less than the preceding 12 months, a mutual residence and with whom the employee maintains a committed relationship, as defined in § 32-701(1).

(5)

“Paid leave” means accrued increments of compensated leave provided by an employer for use by an employee during an absence from employment for any of the reasons specified in § 32-131.02(b).

(6)

“Premium pay program” means a plan offered by an employer pursuant to which an employee may elect to receive extra pay in lieu of benefits.

(7)

“Sexual abuse” means any offense described in Chapter 30 of Title 22 [§ 22-3001 et seq.]

et seq.

(8)

“Student” means an employee who:

(A)

(i)

Is a full-time student, as defined by an accredited institution of higher education;

(ii)

Is employed by the institution at which the student is enrolled;

(iii)

Is employed for less than 25 hours per week; and

(iv)

Does not replace an employee subject to this chapter; or

(B)

Is employed as part of the Year Round Program for Youth, as established by the Department of Employment Services.

History

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 2, 55 DCR 3452
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-89, § 2(a), 61 DCR 317

Cross References

As to applicability of chapter being contingent upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, see §  32-131.17.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-89 rewrote (2); and substituted “who directly or indirectly or through an agent or any other person, including through the services of a temporary services or staffing agency or similar entity, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of” for “who employs” in (3).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 12 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-164, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13734).

Editor's Notes

Section 7095 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 18 of D.C. Law 17-152.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-89: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-91 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7003, effective Feb. 26, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.